Connecticut, session 2026, SB00052.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
three hundred thousand dollars, in the fiscal year ending on June 30,
2027, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of Veteran
Affairs for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the Veterans of
Foreign Wars Post 5446 in the town of Plainfield for renovations in
compliance with physical accessibility guidelines under the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act.